
https://www.stratfor.com/weekly/long-arm-russian-intelligence
KGB up to no good around the world



http://www.smithsonianmag.com/history/george-koval-atomic-spy-unmasked-125046223/?page=1
	soviet spy spying for most of his life after being born in U.S.

But by Micheal Walsh, who sounds like a Russian propagandist...


------

https://www.afio.com/publications/MAJOR%20OLESON%20Espionage%20Against%20America%20DRAFT2%202015Aug31.pdf

???

Shitting on Golitsyn and Angleton, but everything they said came true...

------




------

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/James_Jesus_Angleton

	He went so far as to speculate that Henry Kissinger might be under KGB influence.

hmmmmmmm

------


http://www.thedailybeast.com/articles/2016/02/27/my-lunch-with-the-spider-who-nearly-wrecked-the-cia.html
	President Richard Nixon appointed Colby Director of Central Intelligence in 1973. In 1974, to end “the great mole hunt,” Colby fired Angleton before, he, too, left the agency in 1976.

The fuck was up with Nixon? Russians get to his head too?

http://www.drugpolicy.org/news/2016/03/top-adviser-richard-nixon-admitted-war-drugs-was-policy-tool-go-after-anti-war-proteste

	A decades old quote from President Nixon's administration is making front page news and being shared widely around the web. The quote from John Ehrlichman, who served as President Richard Nixon’s domestic policy chief gained new notoriety after appearing in a cover story in Harper’s Magazine by author Dan Baum.

	“You want to know what this was really all about,” Ehrlichman, who died in 1999, said, referring to Nixon’s declaration of war on drugs. “The Nixon campaign in 1968, and the Nixon White House after that, had two enemies: the antiwar left and black people. You understand what I’m saying. We knew we couldn’t make it illegal to be either against the war or black, but by getting the public to associate the hippies with marijuana and blacks with heroin, and then criminalizing both heavily, we could disrupt those communities. We could arrest their leaders, raid their homes, break up their meetings, and vilify them night after night on the evening news. Did we know we were lying about the drugs? Of course we did.”

maybe?

http://www.cnn.com/2016/03/23/politics/john-ehrlichman-richard-nixon-drug-war-blacks-hippie/
	One of Richard Nixon's top advisers and a key figure in the Watergate scandal said the war on drugs was created as a political tool to fight blacks and hippies, according to a 22-year-old interview recently published in Harper's Magazine.

Why is this comning out now? (Tom LoBanco reporting it mean anything?)

Dan Baum who reported it seems to mostly just try to politicize gun control? ok?

------

https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/csi-publications/csi-studies/studies/fall_winter_2001/article08.html
	The need for counterintelligence (CI) has not gone away, nor is it likely to.  The end of the Cold War has not even meant an end to the CI threat from the former Soviet Union.  The foreign intelligence service of the new democratic Russia, the Sluzhba Vneshney Razvedki Rossii (SVRR), has remained active against us.  It was the SVRR that took over the handling of Aldrich Ames from its predecessor, the KGB, in 1991.  It was the SVRR that ran CIA officer Harold James Nicholson against us from 1994 to 1996.  It was the SVRR that was handling FBI special agent Earl Pitts when he was arrested for espionage in 1996.  It was the SVRR that planted a listening device in a conference room of the State Department in Washington in the summer of 1999.  And it was the SVRR that was handling FBI special agent Robert Hanssen when he was arrested on charges of espionage in February 2001.

------

http://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2007/jun/2/20070602-102726-3747r/
Nosenko debate?

Nosenko provided useful intel on some soviet operations, but negative intel on "monster plot" and assassination of JFK

------

https://twitter.com/20committee/status/704751046514630656
	Nosenko = KGB plant; Golitsyn legit but made a lot of stuff up

hmmm


----------------------------------------


https://www.wsj.com/articles/SB10000872396390444097904577537044185191340
http://web.archive.org/web/20170317024622/http://www.justicefornorthcaucasus.com/jfnc_message_boards/analysis_opinion.php?entry_id=1343340602&title=russian-spy-ring-aimed-to-make-children-agents
    A Russian spy ring busted in the U.S. two years ago planned to recruit members’ children to become agents, and one had already agreed to his parents’ request, according to current and former U.S. officials.

    When the suspects were arrested in 2010 with much fanfare, official accounts suggested they were largely ineffectual. New details about their time in the U.S., however, suggest their work was more sophisticated and sometimes more successful than previously known.

    ...The effort to bring children into the family business suggests the ring was thinking long term: Children born or reared in America were potentially more valuable espionage assets than their parents because when they grew up they would be more likely to pass a U.S. government background check.

    ...His parents revealed their double life to him well before their arrest, according to current and former officials, whose knowledge of the discussion was based on surveillance by the Federal Bureau of Investigation that included bugging suspects’ homes. The officials said the parents also told their son they wanted him to follow in their footsteps.

    He agreed, said the officials. At the end of the discussion with his parents, according to one person familiar with the surveillance, the young man stood up and saluted “Mother Russia.” He also agreed to travel to Russia to begin formal espionage training, officials said.

    ...Based on their extensive surveillance of the secret agents and their messages to handlers back in Moscow, U.S. counterintelligence officials believe the grooming of Mr. Foley was part of a long-term goal for some of the group’s children to become spies when they got older.

https://intelnews.org/2010/06/29/02-339/
    The aim of the alleged spy ring is said to have been to supply Moscow with intelligence on US defense policy, specifically nuclear weapons, as well as various Congressional activities. It appears that most of the alleged spy ring’s contacts were in the Washington, DC beltway, and included members of nongovernmental organizations, pressure groups, think tanks, and lobbyists. It is worth noting that the ten Russian NOCs have not been charged with espionage, but rather with “conspiring to act as unauthorized foreign agents” and “conspiracy to commit money laundering”.

http://www.cbsnews.com/news/fbi-sheds-new-light-on-russian-spy-ring/
    While the deep cover agents didn't steal any secrets, an FBI counterintelligence official told The Associated Press they were making progress.

    They "were getting very close to penetrating U.S. policymaking circles" through a friend of an unnamed member of President Obama's Cabinet, FBI assistant director for counterintelligence C. Frank Figliuzzi told The Associated Press.

    He did not give details, but Russian spy Cynthia Murphy of Montclair, N.J. provided financial planning for a venture capitalist with close ties to Bill and Hillary Clinton.

http://bigstory.ap.org/article/5a189a45ebaf4c86a330eb87d88beadd/long-new-hacks-us-worried-russian-spying-efforts
http://fortune.com/2017/03/17/the-americans-russian-spies/
	Though allegations of meddling in the political process represent a stunning new flare-up in relations between the two countries, U.S. intelligence agencies for years have been concerned by Russian efforts to infiltrate American society and government.

	..."What we have seen as far as the arrests is really only scratching the surface of the real Russian activity here," said Scott Stewart, vice president of tactical analysis at the Texas-based Stratfor intelligence firm.


	But a few sensational Justice Department prosecutions in the last decade have pulled back the curtain on Russian efforts to recruit university students, gather information on the stock market and on sanctions, sway public opinion and cultivate well-placed contacts. And recent hacking allegations make clear that old-fashioned spying techniques have now been augmented by cyber expertise that can in some cases accomplish similar goals.

	...More recently, Buryakov was sentenced to two and a half years in prison for his spying efforts, which in addition to working to gain information about the New York Stock Exchange, also included an attempt to shape political opinion.

	He admitted to working to sway union opinion about a Canadian company's planned deal to build aircraft in Russia — efforts known among experts as "active measures." That political engagement in some ways resembles what U.S. officials say was a Russian effort to use an email hack to politically harm Democratic presidential candidate Hillary Clinton.

http://articles.latimes.com/2011/oct/31/nation/la-na-russian-spies-20111101
    The agents, whom the U.S. sent to Russia in July 2010 in the largest spy swap since the Cold War, are not accused of stealing any U.S. secrets. But they were more dangerous than commonly believed, C. Frank Figliuzzi, FBI assistant director for counterintelligence, said in an interview.

    They were "the cream of the crop" of trained Russian intelligence agents, he said, and they were sent here to blend in and befriend American policymakers. They were succeeding, Figliuzzi said.

    "Several were getting close to high-ranking officials," he said. One had gone to work for a confidant of a U.S. Cabinet member, he added, declining to offer details.

http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/russian-spies-eye-golden-prize-white-house-source/story?id=45531117
    “They always targeted political figures,” David Major, a retired FBI counterintelligence agent explained to ABC News. “They want to know who is a mover and shaker in our society, who affects it.”

    And today as questions continue to mount over what contacts Trump campaign aides may have had with Russian intelligence operatives, the White House continues to dispute media reports that any of the president’s associates had such contact while on the campaign trail.

    U.S. intelligence officials say the Russians are engaged in a massive campaign to infiltrate and disrupt American politics. It has gone on for decades, originally with the Cold War goal of placing a mole inside the White House, a retired KGB officer who once ran spy operations in Washington told ABC News.

------

http://www.thedailybeast.com/articles/2016/02/27/my-lunch-with-the-spider-who-nearly-wrecked-the-cia.html
	President Richard Nixon appointed Colby Director of Central Intelligence in 1973. In 1974, to end “the great mole hunt,” Colby fired Angleton before, he, too, left the agency in 1976.

	...Five or six years later, after a stint in Central America covering the CIA’s wars, and then on assignment in the Middle East, where I began to explore that region’s vast universe of untrue facts, I was much more familiar with the kinds of people and the ways of thinking that Angleton represented.

	They were a dying breed, in fact, and their greatest skill, the collection and analysis of “human intelligence” was a dying art. The big money—the almost unfathomably huge money—spent by the American intelligence community went on satellites and electronic snooping of various descriptions. Serious intelligence gathering was supposed to come through technical means. The “people” part of the CIA was withering away, except, perhaps, for covert ops of the kind Colby had favored. As his son told a conference at the Wilson Center in Washington in 2012, “My father’s favorite expression was, ‘March towards the sound of the guns.’ Get into the action. If there’s a battle going on, go to it.”

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/James_Jesus_Angleton
	Angleton's resignation was announced on Christmas Eve of 1974, just as President Ford demanded that Colby report on the allegations and as various Congressional committees announced that they would launch their own inquiries. Angleton told reporters from United Press International that he was quitting after 31 years because "my usefulness has ended" and the CIA was getting involved in "police state activities." Three of Angleton's senior aides in counter-intelligence—his deputy Raymond Rocca, executive officer of the counter-intelligence division William J. Hood, and Angleton's chief of operations Newton S. Miller—were coaxed into retirement within a week of Angleton's resignation after it was made clear that they would be transferred elsewhere in the agency rather than promoted, and the counter-intelligence staff was reduced from 300 to 80 people.

	...Rumors swirled around Washington thereafter that Colby was himself the KGB mole but these were never conclusively attributed to Angleton.[citation needed] Angleton was awarded the Distinguished Intelligence Medal, the CIA's second highest honor, in 1975.

	Some within CIA considered Golitsyn discredited, even before Angleton's ousting but the two did not appear to have lost their faith in one another. They sought the assistance of William F. Buckley, Jr. (himself once a CIA man) in authoring New Lies for Old, which advanced the argument that the USSR planned to fake its collapse to lull its enemies into a false sense of victory. Buckley refused but later went on to write a novel about Angleton, Spytime: The Undoing of James Jesus Angleton. In his book Wedge - The Secret War between the FBI and CIA (Knopf, 1994), Mark Riebling stated that of 194 predictions made in New Lies For Old, 139 had been fulfilled by 1993, 9 seemed 'clearly wrong', and the other 46 were 'not soon falsifiable'.

https://archive.org/details/GolitsynAnatoleTheNewLiesForOldOnes
	The West recognizes the communist military threat but misinterprets the political threat. With the best of intentions, United States policy has labored hard to bring about a liberalization in the USSR and Eastern Europe with its human rights policy and encouragement for the internal dissident movement; but it has failed to realize that the dissident movement has been shaped and controlled by the party apparatus and the KGB, and that a sham "liberalization" may well be the next major step in the disinformation program. 

	Pursuit of a realistic foreign policy by the United States has been made even more difficult by the demoralization of their intelligence and counterintelligence services that followed the Watergate exposures and the overblown campaign to restrict the functions of the CIA and FBI. The CIA's capacity for political action was curtailed and two thousand experienced officers were retired. Particular damage was done to US counterintelligence, whose task it should be to analyze communist policy and tactics, forecast communist intentions, and so help to protect the nation and its intelligence services from communist penetration, subversion, agents of influence, and disinformation.

http://www.nytimes.com/1985/06/16/us/us-frustrated-in-efforts-to-counter-soviet-spying.html
	While the Government has debated the number of counterintelligence agents it needs, the Soviet Union has improved and expanded its intelligence operations here, senior officials said.

	Over the last decade, intelligence officials said, Moscow has more than doubled the number of intelligence officers assigned to the United States while at the same time broadening their operations to focus on American technology and military industries.

	In the past Soviet officers worked chiefly in only four or five major cities, including New York, Washington and San Francisco. But Mr. O'Malley said they now operate nationwide.

   	In addition, past and present intelligence officials say the quality of K.G.B. agents has significantly improved since the days when American officers said they could easily spot them by their baggy pants and awkward English.

    ...The last group consists of undercover Soviet officers who enter the country illegally, take up residence as American citizens and try to blend into American society.

    These "illegals,"" report directly to Moscow, intelligence officials say, and try to find jobs that give them access to sensitive information. The most famous of these was Col. Rudolf Abel, a Soviet officer who ran a successful spy network in the 1950's.

    Admiral Turner, the former C.I.A. Director, said, "I suspect there are a sizable number of illegals in the United States," although intelligence officals say no one knows for sure.

    For several years the Congressional intelligence committees have been struggling to increase the number of F.B.I. agents assigned to the counterintelligence office.

    "For the last three or four years, our intelligence committee has increased the F.C.I. manpower above what the Administration asked for,'' said Senator Leahy, the committee's vice chairman, referring to the foreign counterintelligence office. Still, he added, "There are nowhere near enough agents."


------

https://www.usnews.com/news/articles/2009/07/17/declassified-documents-reveal-kgb-spies-in-the-us
	July 17, 2009

	But newly released documents from U.S. and Soviet archives show that hundreds of people, from the famous to the obscure, crossed paths with Soviet intelligence during the pre-World War II years. They include the country's most famous physicist, Robert Oppenheimer, novelist Ernest Hemingway, and civil servants like Hiss. There were journalists, too, like Walter Lippmann, I. F. Stone, and Bernard Redmont, a former correspondent for U.S. News who has been denying spying allegations for more than a half century.

https://newrepublic.com/article/63602/now-we-know
	June 17, 2009

	But amusing though the details may be, the most significant contribution of Klehr's and Haynes's book is its revelation of the sheer extent of Soviet espionage in America, and the numbers of people involved in it. Despite the length of this hefty volume, Haynes and Klehr discuss only a portion of some five hundred agents who at some point worked for the KGB, and about whom some details can be found in Vassiliev's notes or in the Venona files. Not all of these people were actually passing on information. Some worked as handlers, couriers, recruiters and talent spotters. The role of others may well have been exaggerated, as critics have pointed out, by the eager workers of the KGB--though certainly not all of them, given the specific details of information handed over.

	If only a quarter of the people whose names appear in the files were truly agents, the numbers are still much larger than anyone previously suspected, and they represent a far deeper penetration into American society than we have hitherto known. As it turns out, the KGB in the 1930s had agents or contacts in the State Department, the Commerce Department, the Justice Department, and the OSS, the wartime intelligence agency. KGB associates were scattered throughout the Manhattan Project as well as in research institutions and private companies specializing in chemistry, aviation engineering, and physics. There were agents in the media and the literary world. The KGB even tried, not very successfully, to recruit Ernest Hemingway.

http://wunc.org/post/former-spymaster-three-decades-cia
	Jul 1, 2013

	A central theme in his books is that spies have often been successful in the U.S. because Americans are consistently loath to believe their countrymen would betray them. "You certainly see in the first hundred years or so [of American history], they are totally blind to this," Sulick told host Frank Stasio on The State of Things. "But even on into the 20th century, in the 1930s and 1940s when the Soviets basically riddle the FDR administration and the Manhattan Project with - now they're estimating - about 500 spies."

https://www.fbi.gov/news/stories/operation-ghost-stories-inside-the-russian-spy-case
	October 31, 2011

	The arrests of 10 Russian spies last year provided a chilling reminder that espionage on U.S. soil did not disappear when the Cold War ended. The highly publicized case also offered a rare glimpse into the sensitive world of counterintelligence and the FBI’s efforts to safeguard the nation from those who would steal our vital secrets.

	Our case against the Russian Foreign Intelligence Service (SVR) operatives—dubbed Operation Ghost Stories—went on for more than a decade. Today we are releasing dozens of still images, surveillance video clips, and documents related to the investigation as part of a Freedom of Information Act request.

	Although the SVR “illegals,” as they were called, never got their hands on any classified documents, their intent from the start was serious, well-funded by the SVR, and far-ranging.

	“The Russian government spent significant funds and many years training and deploying these operatives,” said one of our counterintelligence agents who worked on the case. “No government does that without expecting a return on its investment.”

	Our agents and analysts watched the deep-cover operatives as they established themselves in the U.S. (some by using stolen identities) and went about leading seemingly normal lives—getting married, buying homes, raising children, and assimilating into American society.

	Using surveillance and sophisticated techniques, aided by support from intelligence analysts, investigators gathered information to understand the threat posed by the spies as well as their methods, or tradecraft.

	The deep-cover Russian spies may not have achieved their objective, but they were not idle. They collected information and transmitted it back to Russia, and they were actively engaged in what is known in the spy business as “spotting and assessing.”

	They identified colleagues, friends, and others who might be vulnerable targets, and it is possible they were seeking to co-opt people they encountered in the academic environment who might one day hold positions of power and influence.

	Perhaps the most famous example of this tactic—the Cambridge Five—took place in Great Britain. Soviet intelligence “talent spotters” were able to recruit Cambridge University students in the 1930s—including future spy Kim Philby—who would later rise to power in the British government and become Soviet operatives during World War II and into the 1950s.

	“We believe the SVR illegals may well have hoped to do the same thing here,” said a counterintelligence agent.

http://www.nytimes.com/books/first/a/andrew-sword.html
	THE MITROKHIN ARCHIVE

    ...The facts, however, are far more sensational even than the story dismissed as impossible by the SVR. The KGB defector had brought with him to Britain details not of a few hundred but of thousands of Soviet agents and intelligence officers in all parts of the globe, some of them "illegals" living under deep cover abroad, disguised as foreign citizens.

http://www.sandiegouniontribune.com/sdut-soviet-defectors-trove-of-kgb-secrets-made-public-2014jul06-story.html
	July 6 2014

	CAMBRIDGE, England (AP) — The papers spent years hidden in a milk churn beneath a Russian dacha and read like an encyclopedia of Cold War espionage.

	Original documents from one of the biggest intelligence leaks in history — a who's who of Soviet spying — were released Monday after being held in secret for two decades.

	The files smuggled out of Russia in 1992 by senior KGB official Vasili Mitrokhin describe sabotage plots, booby-trapped weapons caches and armies of agents under cover in the West — the real-life inspiration for the fictional Soviet moles in "The Americans" TV series.

http://entertainment.time.com/2013/01/30/qa-the-cia-officer-behind-the-new-spy-drama-the-americans/
	Jan. 30, 2013

	Joseph Weisberg wanted to be a spy ever since he read John le Carré’s spy novel The Spy Who Came in from The Cold when he was 11. He became a die-hard “cold-warrior,” taking Soviet history classes at Yale University and then went on to work for the CIA between 1990 and 1994.

	...in 2010, after an FBI investigation revealed 10 Russian spies had been living undercover in suburbs nationwide for more than a decade, Weisberg leapt at the opportunity to write a TV series based on the scandal. The deep cover operation seemed closer to the spy novel escapades that inspired him to pursue espionage in the first place. Weisberg, author of two novels An Ordinary Spy (2008) and 10th Grade (2002), wrote a script for The Americans based on his conversations with former colleagues and research from Vasili Mitrokhin’s esteemed notes on the KGB’s Cold War activities.

	...That was absolutely the inspiration for the series. Those spies are called “illegals,” a type of spy that is somewhat unique to Russia’s intelligence service. They were the spies living among us. Some pulled off some real espionage of note, but more often, they would come over, open a business, and try to get a cover going. Then the business would fail, the spies would start telling some lies back home, and then they would sort of disappear. That’s who was arrested in 2010, and Philip and Elizabeth are the 1981 version of those espionage officers.

	But a modern day [setting] didn’t seem like a good idea. People were both shocked and simultaneously shrugged at the [2010] scandal because it didn’t seem like we were really enemies with Russia anymore. An obvious way to remedy that for television was to stick it back in the Cold War.

https://intelnews.org/2015/07/03/01-1728/
	July 3, 2015

	A set of declassified intelligence documents from the 1950s and 1960s offer a glimpse into the secret war fought in Canada between American and Soviet spy agencies at the height of the Cold War. The documents were authored by the United States Central Intelligence Agency and declassified following a Freedom of Information Act request filed on behalf of the Canadian newspaper The Toronto Star. According to the paper, they show that Toronto was a major hub of a prolonged espionage conflict fought between the CIA and the Soviet KGB.

	...Others, like a naturalized Canadian identified in the documents as Ivan Kolaska, were believed by the CIA to have immigrated to Toronto as part of a broader KGB effort to infiltrate the ranks of the anti-communist Eastern European expatriate community in Canada. Some of these infiltrators were able to settle in Canada, marry locals, get jobs and have families, while living a double life. The Star spoke to one Ukrainian immigrant to Canada whose name features in the declassified CIA files. Natalie Bundza, now 78, worked as a travel agent in 1950s’ Toronto and regularly led tourist groups to communist countries. She was a Ukrainian nationalist and anticommunist, but the CIA believed she was pretending to have these beliefs in order to infiltrate the Ukrainian expatriate community in Toronto.

http://www.businessinsider.com/here-was-the-fbis-secret-plan-in-case-nuclear-war-broke-out-2015-1
	Jan. 30, 2015

    The United States government made extreme, top-secret plans for preserving national security in the event of a nuclear attack during the Cold War, according to documents recently released to transparency journalism organization MuckRock.

    The FBI created "Plan C" in 1956, the same year the Red Army shut down the Hungarian Revolution, and if activated, Plan C would have put the nation under martial law and allowed for nearly 13,000 people to be detained for having links to "subversive organizations."

https://d3gn0r3afghep.cloudfront.net/foia_files/1240819-0_-_066-HQ-19017_-_Section_01.PDF
	Emergency Detention Program - The Federal Bureau of Investigation schedules for apprehension individuals whose affiliations with subversive organizations are so pronounced that their continued liberty in the event of a national emergency would present a serious threat to the internal security of the country. As of April 17, 1956, 12,949 individuals were scheduled for apprehension in an emergency.

https://www.intelligence.senate.gov/sites/default/files/documents/ICA_2017_01.pdf
	6 January 2017

	During the Cold War, the Soviet Union used intelligence officers, influence agents, forgeries, and press placements to disparage candidates perceived as hostile to the Kremlin, according to a former KGB archivist.

	Since the Cold War, Russian intelligence efforts related to US elections have primarily focused on foreign intelligence collection. For decades, Russian and Soviet intelligence services have sought to collect insider information from US political parties that could help Russian leaders understand a new US administration’s plans and priorities.

	The Russian Foreign Intelligence Service (SVR) Directorate S (Illegals) officers arrested in the United States in 2010 reported to Moscow about the 2008 election.


wait is this saying something about Obama?


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/12/31/opinion/sunday/nixons-vietnam-treachery.html
	DEC. 31, 2016

	A newfound cache of notes left by H. R. Haldeman, his closest aide, shows that Nixon directed his campaign’s efforts to scuttle the peace talks, which he feared could give his opponent, Vice President Hubert H. Humphrey, an edge in the 1968 election. On Oct. 22, 1968, he ordered Haldeman to “monkey wrench” the initiative.

	...Nixon had entered the fall campaign with a lead over Humphrey, but the gap was closing that October. Henry A. Kissinger, then an outside Republican adviser, had called, alerting Nixon that a deal was in the works: If Johnson would halt all bombing of North Vietnam, the Soviets pledged to have Hanoi engage in constructive talks to end a war that had already claimed 30,000 American lives.

	But Nixon had a pipeline to Saigon, where the South Vietnamese president, Nguyen Van Thieu, feared that Johnson would sell him out. If Thieu would stall the talks, Nixon could portray Johnson’s actions as a cheap political trick.

http://www.business-standard.com/article/politics/soviet-gave-money-to-40-congress-mps-in-indira-gandhi-era-cia-report-117013000796_1.html
	January 30, 2017

	The Soviets pumped huge amounts of cash to influence Indian politicians, including a large number of Congress MPs during former prime minister Indira Gandhi's government, to influence Indian policies, according to a now declassified December 1985 CIA report.

	This continued into the Rajiv Gandhi rule, although he tried to reduce the influence of Moscow on India, says the report.

	The confidential 24-page memo, redacted heavily with lots of pages removed, also notes that the Soviets funded opposition parties including the Communist Party of India (CPI) and the CPI-Marxist "through a combination of kickback schemes, normal business transactions and direct cash payments".

	"In addition to party funding, the Soviets channel money to individual Congress and opposition politicians (through) clandestine payments. This cash is reportedly obtained from the favourable Soviet trade balance," said the document titled "The Soviets in India", which is one of the millions of CIA memos declassified recently.

	"As many as 40 per cent Congress MPs in (Indira) Gandhi's last government had received Soviet political contributions," the report reads.

------

http://www.reuters.com/article/us-nuclear-summit-obama-medvedev-idUSBRE82P0JI20120326
	President Barack Obama was caught on camera on Monday assuring outgoing Russian President Dmitry Medvedev that he will have "more flexibility" to deal with contentious issues like missile defense after the U.S. presidential election.

	Obama, during talks in Seoul, urged Moscow to give him "space" until after the November ballot, and Medvedev said he would relay the message to incoming Russian president Vladimir Putin.

http://econintersect.com/pages/contributors/contributor.php?post=201608250446
	Getting Away With Murder

	Since returning to wetwork in the Putin era, Russian intelligence has encountered very few consequences to deter it from such nefarious activities. Russian operatives involved in assassinations in Turkey and Qatar were caught and subsequently released back to Russia. Despite publicly accusing Russian agents of murdering Litvinenko with tea spiked with polonium-210, the British government has little hope of ever gaining custody of the killers. Unable to interrogate the responsible parties, authorities in the United Kingdom have no evidence to implicate the likely masterminds behind the assassination, Russia's intelligence leadership. The United States has tried to sanction Russian officials for their role in illicit affairs. In 2012, Congress passed the Magnitsky Act to punish the officials responsible for the death of Russian lawyer Sergei Magnitsky in 2009. The Russians responded by barring Americans from adopting Russian children by American parents and blacklisting several U.S. officials.

	In light of Russian intelligence's far-flung and often unabashed operations, the Stepanova family is right to fear for its safety, even though it is living in the United States. After all, Stepanova and her family would not be the first people associated with the Russian doping scandal to die under mysterious circumstances. On Feb. 3, the chairman of Russia's anti-doping agency, who resigned in disgrace after Stepanova's revelations came to light, died suddenly. Less than two weeks later, the agency's former president succumbed to an unexpected massive heart attack.

http://www.nytimes.com/2010/06/29/world/europe/29spy.html
    After years of F.B.I. surveillance, investigators decided to make the arrests last weekend, just after an upbeat visit to President Obama by the Russian president, Dmitri A. Medvedev, said one administration official. Mr. Obama was not happy about the timing, but investigators feared some of their targets might flee, the official said.

http://www.thedailybeast.com/articles/2016/07/09/is-this-american-spy-dead-or-was-he-ever-real.html?via=mobile&source=twitter
	Known within the FBI as “Operation Ghost Stories,” the SVR illegals case was both sensationalized by the tabloid press—mostly thanks to the pouty and curvaceous Chapman—and downplayed by the Obama administration, then still in final stages of carting out its ambitious “reset” policy with Moscow, which had been running some of the illegals since before the collapse of the Soviet Union when the SVR was still the KGB.

http://www.cbsnews.com/news/fbi-sheds-new-light-on-russian-spy-ring/
	President Dmitry Medvedev awarded the 10 freed spies Russia's highest honors at a Kremlin ceremony.

	The swap was Washington's idea, raised when U.S. law enforcement officials told Mr. Obama that it was time to start planning the arrests.

	The case was brought to a swift conclusion before it could complicate the president's campaign to "reset" U.S. relations with Russia, strained by years of tensions over U.S. foreign policy and the 2008 Russian-Georgian war. All 10 of the captured spies were charged with failing to register as foreign agents.

http://www.politico.com/story/2015/09/pro-defense-farkas-wrightewing-214223
	The Pentagon’s top official overseeing military relations with Russia and Ukraine is resigning amid the ongoing debate within the Obama administration over how to respond to Russian moves in Ukraine and Syria.

	Evelyn Farkas, deputy assistant secretary of defense for Russia, Ukraine and Eurasia, is leaving her post at the end of next month after five years with the Defense Department, a senior defense official confirmed to POLITICO.

	Another senior defense official said the administration would likely have a hard time finding a replacement.

	"There are not a lot of Europe experts in this administration who have a long record of accomplishment," the official said. "There's no doubt this leaves the Pentagon weaker in terms of its policy-making on European issues."

	Farkas had no comment Tuesday.

	Her departure comes at a sensitive time for the administration as President Barack Obama’s national security team is divided over how to respond to Ukraine’s pleas for more advanced weapons to help battle Moscow-backed rebels and Russia’s military deployments in Syria.

	On one side are those who are open to providing lethal aid to Ukraine, including Obama’s own secretary of Defense, Ash Carter. On the other side are doves including Obama himself, who want to support Ukraine with non-lethal equipment but who fear that arming Ukraine against Russia might prompt an escalation that could bring the long-simmering crisis to a boil.

	So far, the president has constrained the U.S. response, opting to provide vehicles, counter-mortar radars, body armor and other such equipment — but not the anti-tank missiles or other weapons Ukraine really wants.

	...Obama pushed out his previous defense secretary, Chuck Hagel, after he urged a stronger American response to Russia’s aggression. Hagel also questioned the president’s strategy for arming so-called moderate Syrian fighters against the Islamic State, a program that has since all but imploded in an embarrassment for the administration.


http://www.politico.com/story/2015/11/evelyn-farkas-russia-pentagon-215517
	Evelyn Farkas, who served as deputy assistant secretary of defense for Russia, Ukraine and Eurasia until last Friday, made clear in an exit interview with reporters on Wednesday that her departure "was not motivated by policy differences” that could not be bridged.

	But she acknowledged she advocated for the administration to do more to deter Russia, including providing “lethal, defensive assistance to Ukraine, primarily anti-tank weapons.” She and others at the Pentagon advocating lethal aid have been overruled by the White House.

	...She insisted, though, that she wasn’t leaving the administration with any hard feelings, explaining that now was “a good time personally for me to leave.”

	“I will say that certainly I advocated for things internally, and I have personal views that may be further afield or may be slightly different from what the current administration position is, but I’ve always felt that I gave my advice and was listened to and we had a full hearing and we have a very healthy inter-agency process.”

	She demurred when asked about her post-Pentagon plans.

	“I’m going to take my time to decide exactly what is next, and I’ll leave it at that,” Farkas said. 

https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/three-white-house-officials-tied-to-files-shared-with-house-intelligence-chairman/2017/03/30/de4b8c30-1589-11e7-9e4f-09aa75d3ec57_story.html
    The interview took place after the New York Times reported that the Obama White House, fearing the new administration would sweep it under the rug, had spread information about Russian efforts to undermine the presidential election. Farkas said, “I was urging my former colleagues and . . . the Hill people, get as much information as you can, get as much intelligence as you can, before President Obama leaves the administration.”

    “That’s why there were so many leaks,” said Farkas, now a senior fellow at the Atlantic Council.

    ...Farkas, in an interview with The Post, said she “didn’t give anybody anything except advice,” was not a source for any stories and had nothing to leak. Noting that she left government in October 2015, she said, “I was just watching like anybody else, like a regular spectator” as initial reports of Russia contacts began to surface after the election.

    As a former staff member of the Senate Armed Services Committee, and a former Defense official involved with Russian affairs, she said she “got worried” that the Obama White House was not briefing Congress on what it knew. “I know how the Russians operate,” she said, and called former colleagues to make sure Congress was being informed.

http://thehill.com/blogs/ballot-box/presidential-races/305065-obama-on-election-the-sun-will-rise-in-the-morning
	Obama on election: 'The sun will rise in the morning'

https://www.nytimes.com/2016/12/17/us/politics/obama-putin-russia-hacking-us-elections.html
	Obama Confronts Complexity of Using a Mighty Cyberarsenal Against Russia

http://money.cnn.com/2016/12/16/technology/obama-us-vulnerable-to-hacking/
	US more vulnerable to hacking than Russia, Obama says

https://www.usnews.com/news/national-news/articles/2017-01-18/at-last-presser-obama-insists-were-going-to-be-ok
	At Last Presser, Obama Insists ‘We’re Going to Be OK’

------


http://historynewsnetwork.org/article/106101
	The recent public release, in defiance of the Russian government, of 1,115 pages of notes from the KGB archives has received a surprisingly muted response from historians. The notes, taken by Alexander Vassiliev, a former KGB officer, over a two year period, are a treasure trove that could and should be revitalizing the study of early Cold War espionage. The Vassiliev notebooks constitute the most wide-ranging, detailed source of information about the KGB's activities in America immediately before, during and for the decade after World War II, and will remain so unless and until Russia decides to open its intelligence archives. In contrast to most of the voluminous notes Vasili Mitrokhin, a KGB archivist, smuggled out of Russia, the Vassiliev notebooks along with English translations have been released and are freely available on the Internet.

	Rather than explore the extraordinary new insights into Soviet espionage Vassiliev's notebooks provide, most commentary about the notebooks, as well as reviews of a book based on them, Spies: The Rise and Fall of the KGB in America (Yale University Press, 2009), has followed the familiar contours of stale, decades-old debates over McCarthyism. The dust stirred by seemingly interminable scuffles between anti-Communists and anti-anti-Communists continues to obscure the study of Soviet espionage in America two decades after the fall of the Iron Curtain.

	The public discussion of the Vassiliev notebooks has largely centered on three themes. Two involve the guilt or innocence of cultural icons, Alger Hiss and I.F. Stone. The third argument is broader in scope. It is the suggestion that the now irrefutable evidence that hundreds of American Communists spied for the USSR is less important or interesting than the abuses committed by anti-Communists in the 1950s, and that documenting real espionage somehow validates Joseph McCarthy's witch hunts.

	The attention to the Vassiliev notebooks' new information about Hiss is tedious, but inevitable. This is a controversy that should have died 30 years ago and hasn't only because of the efforts of a small, vocal group that is absolutely convinced that Hiss was an innocent victim. No amount of documentation, including the fact that documents Vassiliev copied unambiguously identify him as a Soviet agent, can persuade these true believers otherwise.

http://www.dnaindia.com/world/report-defecting-kgb-agents-known-to-exaggerate-3517
	LONDON: “You have to be terribly cautious with all this spy stuff. KGB agents who defect are known for exaggerating just to market their own positions, after all they have a vested interest,” warned Mike Bowker, a Soviet expert at the University of East Anglia.

	Commenting on the revelations in The Mitrokhin Archive II which has got the Congress Party on the defensive, Bowker agreed with RK Dhawan that ‘suitcases full of banknotes were said to be routinely taken to Gandhi’s house' was definitely “an embellishment to sell books”.

http://spartacus-educational.com/Vasili_Mitrokhin.htm
	In August 1993, Ronald Kessler published his best-selling book, The FBI: Inside the World's Most Powerful Law Enforcement Agency, reported that the FBI had been interviewing a former KGB employee who had access to KGB files. "According to his account, the KGB had had many hundreds of Americans and possibly more than a thousand spying for them in recent years. So specific was the information that the FBI was quickly able to establish the source's credibility." Other journalists followed up the story and Time Magazine reported that "sources familiar with the case" of the KGB defector had identified him as a former employee of the First Chief Directorate, but described Kessler's figures of recent Soviet spies in the United States as "highly exaggerated".

https://www.theguardian.com/world/2014/jul/07/kgb-defector-cold-war-vasil-mitrokhin-notes-public
	The FBI described the Mitrokhin files as "the most complete and extensive intelligence ever received from any source". However, intelligence analysts and some Soviet defectors have warned that the KGB seriously exaggerated the significance and number of its contacts and operations to impress the Soviet leadership – and increase its budget.

http://www.nytimes.com/2010/06/29/world/europe/29spy.html
	“The magnitude, and the fact that so many illegals were involved, was a shock to me,” said Oleg D. Kalugin, a former K.G.B. general who was a Soviet spy in the United States in the 1960s and 1970s under “legal” cover as a diplomat and Radio Moscow correspondent. “It’s a return to the old days, but even in the worst years of the cold war, I think there were no more than 10 illegals in the U.S., probably fewer.”

http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2010/07/12/AR2010071205341.html
    Two questions: Have we caught all the "illegals" that Russia's security service, the SVR, has planted over the years in the United States? And will the SVR press the reset button with the Obama administration and not send additional "illegals" to this country?

    In a background briefing for reporters on Thursday, a senior administration official familiar with the Justice Department's assessment of the situation described how the 10 who were arrested as "sleeper agents" had been under investigation for years. The official added: "We have effectively shut down the illegal program here."

    Other sources in the law enforcement and intelligence communities do not share that view, although, of course, they will not say so publicly.

    As one former senior intelligence official put it, "How would we know?"

    The Russians have used "illegals" in their espionage activities since the October 1917 revolution. As the FBI put it in the June 27 complaint, "illegals" are provided false identities and documents, obtain citizenship or legal resident permits of target countries, and "pursue degrees at target-country universities, obtain employment, and join relevant professional associations." They "work to hide all connections between themselves and Russia, even as they act at the direction and under the control of the SVR." Gathering data on people who can later be recruited as spies is a primary goal, instead of stealing secrets themselves. In the trade, they are called spotters.

    ... The best public indication of the extent of Moscow's efforts comes from the late Sergei Tretyakov, the former Russian intelligence officer who under the guise of a press officer at the U.N. Mission ran espionage operations in New York City from 1995 to 2000. He served the last three of those years as a double agent for the FBI until he defected to the United States. As Tretyakov told author Pete Earley in the book "Comrade J," at one time he had more than 60 SVR officers working inside the United Nations and more than 160 contacts made up of illegals, outright spies, and other people who knowingly or unknowingly could supply information useful to Russia.

    ... What will the Russians do now? In a C-SPAN interview two years ago, Tretyakov said that when the Cold War was over, the United States asked Russia to stop the KGB's covert propaganda activities that portrayed Washington in foreign media as carrying out terrible activities, such as saying the United States was spreading HIV in Africa.

    In response, Tretyakov said, the KGB closed down "Department A," which ran those activities, but then established the MS program, which did the same thing. "Nothing changed," he said.

    The U.S. answer may have come on PBS's "NewsHour" last week.

    White House Chief of Staff Rahm Emanuel told Jim Lehrer that the arrest of the 10 illegals, their guilty pleas and the prisoner exchange last week "sends a clear signal to, not only Russia, but other countries that will attempt this, that we are on to them."


------

https://www.theguardian.com/world/2016/may/07/discovered-our-parents-were-russian-spies-tim-alex-foley
	Shaun Walker 

	Russia didn’t know whether to be embarrassed or emboldened: its agents had been busted, but what other country would think of mounting such a complex, slow-drip espionage operation in the first place?

ehh, this guy trustworthy? "lived in Russia for years" 

article trying to say Foley children had no idea

	“They showed us photos of our parents in their 20s in uniform, photos of them with medals. That was the moment when I thought, ‘OK, this is real.’ Until that moment, I’d refused to believe any of it was true,” Alex says. He and Tim were taken to an apartment and told to make themselves at home; one of their minders spent the next few days showing them around Moscow; they took them to museums, even the ballet. An uncle and a cousin the brothers had no idea existed paid a visit; a grandmother also dropped by, but she spoke no English and the boys not a word of Russian.

did they tell the kid to say this? iirc the Foley kids knew their parents were spies?

	The programme was the only one of its kind in international espionage. (Many assumed it had been stopped, until the 2010 FBI swoop.) Many intelligence agencies use agents operating without diplomatic cover; some have recruited second-generation immigrants already living abroad, but the Russians have been the only ones to train agents to pretend to be foreigners. 

Is that true? not sure about that but ok

	I have to admit there are some details that bother me. Did they really never suspect a thing?

	In 2012, the Wall Street Journal reported that unnamed US officials claimed an FBI bug placed at the family’s Boston home had picked up the parents revealing their true identities to Tim long before the arrest. Furthermore, the officials said, his parents had told Tim they wanted to groom him as a Russian spy. A second-generation spy would be a much more impressive asset than first-generation illegals, who had built up personas that were solid but not impregnable to background checks. Tim, according to the unnamed officials, agreed he would travel to Moscow for SVR training and even “saluted Mother Russia”.

	Tim strenuously denies the story, insisting it was a total fabrication. “Why would a kid who grew up his whole life believing himself to be Canadian, decide to risk life in prison for a country he had never been to nor had any ties to? Furthermore, why would my parents take a similar risk in telling their teenage son their identities?”

Ok so here he mentions that they swore fealty to mother Russia

	Ultimately, the court seems to be operating as much on emotional as on legal grounds, possibly with the Wall Street Journal story about Tim’s apparent recruitment at the back of its mind. But even if the brothers knew about their parents’ activities (and there is no hard evidence of this)

what


------


https://qz.com/926553/what-happened-to-the-real-russian-spies-who-inspired-the-americans/
	Adam Epstein

	In court documents, the US Department of Justice called the Russian spy ring unearthed in 2010 the “Illegals Program.”

but this isn't the entire illegals program...

	Most of these spies had lived in the US for a long time, spoke good English, held regular jobs, and even had children. They sometimes assumed the identities of real people who had died at a young age. Couples were paired together in Russia “so that they can live together and work together in a host country, under the guise of a married couple,” the FBI alleged in its 2010 indictment. “Illegals who are placed together and cohabit in the country to which they are assigned will often have children together.”

right

	In June 2010, the FBI arrested 10 “illegals,” including four couples. An eleventh man was arrested in Cyprus, but disappeared after posting bail. His current whereabouts are unknown.

ok so implies illegals program more than this

	When asked by Tonight Show host Jay Leno why the US was seemingly short-changed on the deal, then-vice president Joe Biden joked that the 10 Russians arrested weren’t the most adept of spies.

	“We got back four really good ones, Biden said. “And the ten [illegals], they’ve been here a long time, but they hadn’t done much.”

They hadn't? you sure? does Biden even know what they do...

	Indeed, the ten spies were not charged with espionage—a more serious offense—because they all failed to actually access and pass along any classified information. (Phillip and Elizabeth Jennings of The Americans have been considerably more successful than their real-life counterparts.)

saying illegals incompetent because they didn't steal any secrets

	British tabloids purported that Chapman had come perilously close to “honey-potting,” or seducing, a member of president Barack Obama’s cabinet, and that was the reason the FBI swooped in and arrested the spies when it did. But the FBI soon said such claims were patently false, and that the real impetus for the arrests was the work of another “illegal,” Cynthia Murphy, who had been in close contact with a friend and fundraiser of then US secretary of state Hillary Clinton.

FBI says reason for arrest was Murphy getting close to Clinton

	Part of Cynthia’s assignment, according to court documents, was to collect information on Columbia University faculty and students, including those who applied to, or were already hired by, the CIA. She supervised the finances of Alan Patricof, a venture capitalist and philanthropist close to the Clintons.

Cynthia spotting moles?

touches on sob story for Tim Foley

	Vicky Peláez and Mikhail Anatolyevich Vasenkov (Juan Lazaro) were married in 1983 in Peru. Peláez, a TV reporter, was the other “illegal” to use her real name. The couple moved to New York and later had a son, Juan Lazaro Jr.—now a distinguished concert pianist who stayed in the US when his parents were deported to Russia.

Pelaez kid a "distinguished" concert pianist

or spy in training??

spy on pianists lol

never trust a pianist

-----

http://www.newyorker.com/humor/borowitz-report/three-russian-spies-meet-in-the-oval-office

lol

------

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NXUgqzXMvyQ

Jay Leno pointing out that Anna Chapman is hot

Biden says "I thought maybe they'd take Rush Limbaugh or something"

suggesting Rush is Russian?

http://www.thedailybeast.com/vice-president-joe-biden-on-spy-swap

Leno: "why did we trade 10 for 4"

Biden: "we got back 4 really good ones"

The 10 "hadn't done much"

Biden says Russian spies opportunisitc

so sounds legit, the spies hadn't done that much yet


-----


https://www.theguardian.com/world/2011/mar/27/anna-chapman-agent-provocateur
	Marc Bennetts

	Marc Bennetss on how Anna Chapman is hot, having a ball


https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2014/jul/31/vladimir-putin-western-sanctions-russia-flight-mh17-state-propaganda
	Why nothing will dent Vladimir Putin’s soaring popularity at home
	Marc Bennetts

although these things are hard to predict...


------


http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2010/06/29/AR2010062905401.html
	By Jerry Markon and Philip Rucker

	"It's just staggering," said venture capitalist Alan Patricof, who suspects he is the unnamed businessman described by authorities as having been targeted by Cynthia Murphy. "It's off the charts." 

	Patricof, a longtime confidant of Bill and Hillary Clinton, knew Murphy through the Manhattan firm Morea Financial Services, a tax service where she worked and he was a client. Although he said they discussed only business, intercepted communications from the suspect's superiors mentioned a "New York-based financier" as a possible source of information about U.S. foreign policy and White House intelligence, according to the criminal complaint in the case.

what's up with Patricof?

	FBI agents arrested 10 people in the United States on Sunday, including the Murphys and three suspects in Arlington County. On Tuesday, as officials in the United States and Russia sought to prevent the case from harming relations between the two countries, the 11th person charged in Manhattan federal court was arrested on the Mediterranean island of Cyprus as he was about to fly to Budapest. 

"prevent the case from harming relations"

	 Unlike famous spies such as Aldrich H. Ames and Robert P. Hanssen, who did incalculable damage to U.S. national security, those charged this week were ordered not to seek classified data, some federal officials said.

	"They were here under deep cover, as a network in case Russian intelligence ever needed anything," said one law enforcement official, who like others quoted in this report spoke on the condition of anonymity because the investigation is continuing. "The idea was that they would become so Americanized that no one can ever find any connection between them and Russia." 

interesting--spies were ordered not to seek classified data

	 But beneath the carefully constructed exteriors, there were indications of what authorities say was the suspects' real purpose in the United States: to infiltrate academic, policymaking and government-connected circles. Semenko, for example, often attended events sponsored by embassies and nongovernmental organizations.

	Donald Howard Heathfield, an international business consultant who lived with his "wife," Tracey Lee Ann Foley, and their two teenage sons in Cambridge, Mass., sought membership in more than 30 professional, academic and business associations -- including one linked to the Department of Homeland Security, according to his page on LinkedIn. 

infiltrate policy-making, academic, and government-connected circles

	"The tragedy is what's going to happen with these kids," said neighbor Alan Sokolow. 

won't someone PLEAESE think of the children! are they saying you shouldn't arrest a criminal because they have kids? Maybe if they want a better life for their kids, they can not break the law.


------

http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2010/06/29/AR2010062905249.html?hpid=topnews
	By Greg Miller and Philip P. Pan

	...exposing what U.S. intelligence experts described as Moscow's ongoing commitment to aggressive espionage operations, as well its fondness for spycraft techniques that haven't advanced since the KGB was dissolved.

trying to paint them as innefectual?

	"I think it's nutty," Hitz said. "It looks as if it got going at the end of the Soviet era and just continued, even though it wasn't clear what the immediate goals of these people were." 

cold war never ended

	Officials in the United States and Russia sought to contain the fallout from the case at a time of improving relations between the countries. President Obama took Russian President Dmitry Medvedev out for cheeseburgers last week. The administration is seeking Russian support on a range of initiatives, including sanctions designed to curb the nuclear ambitions of Iran. 

sounds familiar...

	Russian Prime Minister Vladimir Putin said at the start of a meeting with former president Bill Clinton that the case showed that U.S. law enforcement agencies "have gotten out of hand." The former KGB agent added that he hopes U.S. relations "will not be damaged." 

Putin barking orders at Bill Clinton, "youre American FBI has gotten out of hand!!!"

	Even so, U.S. officials said they expect Russia to retaliate in time-honored Cold War fashion. "The Russians have to do something," said a former senior U.S. intelligence official who was stationed in Moscow, speculating that Americans in Russia would be rounded up and accused of espionage. "If I was some think tank person in Russia . . . I'd be very nervous." 

And what did they do? install Trump?

	The targets, and the methods employed, struck some as a sign that Russia's once vaunted spy service has struggled to evolve.

	"What a feckless operation," said Mark Lowenthal, a former senior CIA official. "So many of the things they seemed to be after you can find out by listening to the right radio station or reading the right newspaper. . . . It doesn't say a lot about the smarts of the SVR." The letters refer to Russia's foreign intelligence service, one of the successor agencies to the KGB. 

	The tradecraft employed was also spotty, experts said. Records depict scenes in which alleged spies arrived at a coffee shop and opened a laptop specially equipped to send secret transmissions at the precise moment that a vehicle driven by a known Russian official pulled up outside. 

Miller, Pan, and Lowenthal downplaying illegals

	U.S. officials said Russia remains a significant espionage target for American spy agencies but falls much lower on the priority list than places such as Iraq and Afghanistan. The CIA probably has dozens of case officers in Russia, former officials said, but bases nearly all of them in the U.S. Embassy, where they could claim diplomatic immunity if caught. 

downplaying Russia

	Pan reported from Moscow.


------


http://www.nytimes.com/2010/06/30/world/europe/30sleepers.html
	By ELLEN BARRY

	This week’s jaw-dropping arrest of 11 people seems to offer a glimpse into a recent form of the program. Russia has made little comment on the specific accusations, though it called the arrests “baseless” and “unseemly.”

	But if prosecutors are correct, two things seem clear: First, that Russia’s network of illegals has survived, and perhaps even grown, since the Soviet Union’s collapse. And second, that the agents’ assignment — collecting information about politics and getting to know policy makers — can now be achieved through more straightforward means.
Continue reading the main story

	“It strikes me as a very well-organized, very well-thought-out and very out-of date approach,” said Olga Oliker, a senior policy analyst for the RAND Corporation. “I would lay money on bureaucratic inertia. It’s a terribly ineffective approach, but it’s something that might have made sense in a previous period. ”

skipping the whole "agent of influence" thing


------

http://old.seattletimes.com/text/2016658658.html
	 FBI releases new videos, papers about 10 Russian spies
	By Michael Muskal
	Los Angeles Times

	LOS ANGELES — Anna Chapman, now a television star and sometime lingerie model in her native Russia, was the face of the biggest spy swap since the Cold War when she and nine others were arrested in June 2010. On Monday, the FBI released a trove of videos and documents about Chapman and others.

	In one, a woman in her late 20s with reddish hair and sporting big sunglasses walks into a New York City coffee shop, takes a seat and pulls out a laptop computer. She leans forward to talk to her companion and briefly flashes the smile that turned her into an international sensation.


Micheal Muskal pointing out that Anna Chapman is hot

	"The arrests of 10 Russian spies last year provided a chilling reminder that espionage on U.S. soil did not disappear when the Cold War ended," the agency said in an accompanying statement. "The highly publicized case also offered a rare glimpse into the sensitive world of counterintelligence and the FBI's efforts to safeguard the nation from those who would steal our vital secrets."

drawing attention to "stealing secrets," although supposedly they were specifically ordered NOT to steal secrets...

	"The deep-cover Russian spies may not have achieved their objective, but they were not idle. They collected information and transmitted it back to Russia, and they were actively engaged in what is known in the spy business as 'spotting and assessing.' They identified colleagues, friends and others who might be vulnerable targets, and it is possible they were seeking to co-opt people they encountered in the academic environment who might one day hold positions of power and influence," according to the FBI.

quotes more or less the whole FBI press release

	Chapman drew so much interest that Jay Leno, interviewing Vice President Joseph Biden, asked: "Do we have any spies that hot?" Replied Biden: "It was not my idea to send her back."

	After her deportation to Russia, Chapman launched her career as recovering spy celebrity. As recently as Monday, she turned up at a Moscow fashion show.

pointing out Leno and Chapman drawing interest

	Pelaez, a well-known journalist, left Russia for her native Peru, where she was cited as saying she had never spied for Russia and had no idea that her husband was a Russian agent. Her husband, whose real name is Mikhail Vasenkov, claimed to have been born in Uruguay.

	"I am a nearly 60-year-old woman. I love my companion. But I may never forgive him for not being straight with me," she said in a February interview with the Peruvian magazine Caretas.

Peleaz trying to play it off like she never knew

	Soldatov says they probably have been given apartments in a special SVR complex in Moscow and the agency was obliged under Russian law to find them new employment.

	Only Chapman has been allowed to socialize, appear on television and exploit her spying fame.

	"Unlike the others, Chapman wasn't a trained officer," Soldatov said, drawing on his reading of U.S. court documents. Her knowledge of the activities of Russian intelligence operations in the United States appears to have been limited, he said, making her exposure to the public potentially less harmful.

So Chapman was supposedly not really a spy or not a good one

	Her star power may be fading, however. Columnists from social pages ridicule her revealing outfits while bloggers laugh at her gaffes.

	On a recent visit to St. Petersburg University to give a lecture on leadership on behalf of a pro-Kremlin youth organization, she was booed by students who told her to leave and to take her PR stunts elsewhere.

interesting


------

https://www.fbi.gov/news/stories/operation-ghost-stories-inside-the-russian-spy-case
	Although the SVR “illegals,” as they were called, never got their hands on any classified documents, their intent from the start was serious, well-funded by the SVR, and far-ranging.

	...The deep-cover Russian spies may not have achieved their objective, but they were not idle. They collected information and transmitted it back to Russia, and they were actively engaged in what is known in the spy business as “spotting and assessing.”

so the FBI is saying their objective was to "steal secrets?"

	They identified colleagues, friends, and others who might be vulnerable targets, and it is possible they were seeking to co-opt people they encountered in the academic environment who might one day hold positions of power and influence.

or not

	Perhaps the most famous example of this tactic—the Cambridge Five—took place in Great Britain. Soviet intelligence “talent spotters” were able to recruit Cambridge University students in the 1930s—including future spy Kim Philby—who would later rise to power in the British government and become Soviet operatives during World War II and into the 1950s.

	“We believe the SVR illegals may well have hoped to do the same thing here,” said a counterintelligence agent.

so the FBI lays it out pretty well, get close to people in power (or who *might* be in power) and "co-opt" them, using references to history

but the way this is reported in the media paints a different picture

	The SVR was in it for the long haul. The illegals were content to wait decades to obtain their objective, which was to develop sources of information in U.S. policymaking circles

nope, now FBI says develop "sources of information"


------

https://www.theguardian.com/world/2011/oct/31/fbi-russian-spy-ring-anna-chapman
	FBI videos of the Russian agents show Chapman, whose role in the spy saga turned her into an international celebrity


------

http://www.politico.eu/interactive/the-spanish-story-of-a-russian-illegal-russian-spy-moscow/
	By Pierre Briançon

	“Henry Frith,” these sources allege, was an alias for a Russian spy, a so-called “illegal” who lived for years under a carefully constructed “legend” — a false identity, complete with a fake history and background. He is the first “illegal” to have been uncovered and publicly named in Europe since the end of the Cold War.

	There are, they say, others like him on the Continent.

how many?

	Counterintelligence services don’t readily talk about the damages spies have done to national security. The FBI 10 were first said to have built up sources and exchanged information on encrypted laptops and secured USB keys. When the case came to trial, within days of the arrests, the only thing that U.S. authorities alleged in court was that they were guilty of money laundering and of conspiracy to act as unregistered agents of a foreign government.

	No allegations that they accessed classified information were ever made. According to a European intelligence official who wasn’t involved in the Cherepanov case, even if they had stolen secrets or harmed security, “sometimes you just want to get rid of them and trade them against other assets. You rarely jail foreign agents caught in the act. They’re not traitors, after all.”

Are they? are they "Americans" or are they not?

	In most cases, illegals are used as couriers. They don’t behave like the spies portrayed in the current hit television series “The Americans” that was inspired by the FBI 10 case. The Jennings couple in the show leads a perfect Washington suburban life with their two children in the early 1980s, but are highly trained KGB operatives who run agents, kill and occasionally sleep with the enemy. But real-life illegals don’t lead such a James Bond-type of life. Their mission is to blend in.

	“Usually,” said one agent with a detailed knowledge of the case, “those spies serve two purposes. They may sometimes manage their own sources and agents, but mostly they are used as messengers for the SVR because the ‘official’ spies are under a surveillance that prevents them to move around much.” Official spies work out of embassies, operating largely in the open under cover of diplomatic immunity.

	On rare cases an illegal integrates so well that he can climb up the ladder in business or political circles of the new home country. He then becomes invaluable to his or her employer. The most spectacular post-war example was Günther Guillaume, the East German mole sent to West Germany in 1956, who rose to become the secretary of Chancellor Willy Brandt — and caused the latter’s downfall when he was finally unmasked in 1974.

says they are mostly used as messengers, but can rise to positions of power and become valuable

	Agents tasked with fighting Russian spying in Europe these days say they are concerned that the focus on anti-terrorism starves them of resources to contain the SVR’s offensive.

as planned?

	An added complication, according to the European diplomat, is that “some EU countries still have some difficulty considering that Russia is indeed a threat. I don’t think the Italian government, to name one, agrees that it should be treated as such, and that is also the case of many politicians in many EU countries.”


------

https://vault.fbi.gov/ghost-stories-russian-foreign-intelligence-service-illegals/documents/referrals-part-01-of-01/view

non-redacted parts starting page 101

pg 105

	The FBI's investigation has revealed that a network of illegals (the "illegals") is now living and operating in the United States in the service of one primary, long-term goal: to become sufficiently "Americanized" such that they can gather information about the United States for Russia, and can successfully recruit sources who are in, or able to infiltrate, United States policy-making circles

???

contradicts the "ordered not to go for classified info" quote, and any observation of what these people actually do...

pg 118

The SVR spelled out the purpose of the Illegals presence in America in a 2009 message to two co-conspirators who are named as defendants in the attached Complaint. That message, which was sent by Moscow Center, has been decrypted by the FBI and reads, in part, as follows:

	You were sent to the USA for a long-term service trip. Your education, bank accounts, car, house etc. -- al these serve one goal: fulfill your main mission, i.e., to search and develop ties in policymaking circles in US and send intels [intelligence reports]to C[enter].


So, according to the SVR, the illegals main mission is to search and develop ties in policymaking circles and sent intelligence reports to Moscow

but they didn't mention what they were developing ties in policymaking circles for--whoops! (or what to write in their intel reports)

how will the illegals know their mission?!

If all they have to do to not be illegal is "notify the attorney general," I guess all Russia has to do is install a spy as attorney general and have him look the other way

so far they've half-way there!


pg 126-127 conversation between Chapman and Russian spy guy (or secret FBI agent)

pg 142

observations of Vicky Peleaz and others

	On or about Janurary 14, 200, in a South American country, VICKY PELEAZ, the defendant, received a package containing money from a representative of the Russian government.

	...

	During 2004, DONALD OWARS HEATHFIELD, the defendant, met with an employee of the United States GOvernment with regard to nuclear weapons research.

pg 148

video survaillance of Peleaz taking a bag of money

Pg 149

Lazarro telling Peleaz to take a secret message in invisible ink to the Russians

pg 152

Murphey unhappy working for SVR

pg 165

"selected information" on how illegals "pass information and recruit sources"

"recruit sources"? nothing about influence operations? wtf is this?

apparently FBI is retarded or ran by the Russians

how can you fuck up like this and expect to be taken seriously?

also iirc Preet Bahrara was the prosecutor for this case

This is the source I think for the Russian propagandists articles asking "why would they want info that is publicly available?"

talks about "info tasks" getting information on U.S. foreign policy.

sent information on "turnover at the head of the CIA" and the "2008 U.S. presidential election."

	This information was described as having been "received in private conversation with [name omitted], former legislative counsel for US Congress, specialist in [information omitted], member of faculty in economics of [information omitted]. Has contacts within Congress and policymakers of Washington."


Here's something:

	had conversations with him about research programs on small yield high penetration nuclear warheads recently authorized by US Congress (nuclear 'bunker-buster' warheads).

could get non-public info from these sorts of conversations, even info on "how willing is he/she to talk"

Putin would be interested in bunker-buster warheads, since that's what would actually kill him in the event of a nuclear war


pg 166
	...Agree with your proposal to use 'Farmer' to start building network of students in D.C. Your relationship with 'Parrot' looks very promising as a valid source of info from US power circles. To start working on him professionally we need all available details on his background, current position, habits, contacts, opportunities, etc. ..., Plus, you should observe our security rules and recommendations in working with contacts . . . Agree with you [sic] proposal to keep relations with 'Cat' but watch him."


This message makes the "Boston conspirators" sound like newbies? I don't get it. Message supposedly dated 2007

pg 167

interesting convo

Lazaro says SVR doesn't care about Russia? what made him think that?

pg 168

SVR asking for ifnfo on goals of Obama meeting with Russia and how his team plans to do it

	Moscow Center encouraged the New Jersey Conspirators "to send more info on current international affairs vital for R highlighting US approach and providing us w comments made by local expert (political economic) scientist's community. Try to single out tidbits unknown publicly but revealed in private by sources close to State department, Government, major think tanks."

Kindof a weird directive? "try to single out tidbits unknown publicly"? what is going on here?

SVR says cynthia murphey sent useful info on gold market

pg 169

Cynthia Murphy tells Richard Murphey his legend isn't good enough to get into top echelons of the government, so develop sources that could get info instead

SVR tells him his legend not good enough to get a job in Government

SVR's messages sound fake and made-up? something off about them

------


http://articles.latimes.com/2011/oct/31/nation/la-na-russian-spies-20111101
	Russian spies were succeeding, FBI official says

	The 10 sleeper agents exposed in 2010 were reportedly succeeding in efforts to rise in American society and gain connections to policymakers. Newly released documents detail the investigation.

	By Ken Dilanian

	 "Several were getting close to high-ranking officials," he said. One had gone to work for a confidant of a U.S. Cabinet member, he added, declining to offer details.

So now saying they were good, succeeding, "rising in American society" and "getting close to high-ranking officials"


------

http://www.nytimes.com/2010/06/29/world/europe/29spy.html
	In Ordinary Lives, U.S. Sees the Work of Russian Agents

	By SCOTT SHANE and CHARLIE SAVAGEJUNE 28, 2010 


	The alleged agents were directed to gather information on nuclear weapons, American policy toward Iran, C.I.A. leadership, Congressional politics and many other topics, prosecutors say. The Russian spies made contact with a former high-ranking American national security official and a nuclear weapons researcher, among others. But the charges did not include espionage, and it was unclear what secrets the suspected spy ring — which included five couples — actually managed to collect.


implying they were incompetent? innocent?

	“The magnitude, and the fact that so many illegals were involved, was a shock to me,” said Oleg D. Kalugin, a former K.G.B. general who was a Soviet spy in the United States in the 1960s and 1970s under “legal” cover as a diplomat and Radio Moscow correspondent. “It’s a return to the old days, but even in the worst years of the cold war, I think there were no more than 10 illegals in the U.S., probably fewer.”

interesting choice of who to quote...


------

http://swampland.time.com/2010/06/29/the-8-coolest-things-about-the-alleged-russian-spy-ring/
	The 8 Coolest Things About The Alleged Russian Spy Ring

	By Michael Scherer


	A day after the Obama Administration arrested 10 people across the U.S. on charges of being Russian spies, the Russian Foreign Ministry has dismissed the roundup as “completely unfounded,” and alleged that the accusations have been made “in the spirit of cold war spy mania.” There is no doubt that the latter is true

no doubt accusations made up? what is he saying exactly?

------

http://www.nydailynews.com/news/national/russian-spies-double-lives-murphys-living-married-couple-reflects-years-training-source-article-1.463237
	"It's really something you are born with," said Jack Garcia, a retired FBI agent who spent much of his 24-year career working undercover. "You have to be that kind of person. It's an art form."

	...

	Ann Foley and Donald Heathfield lived in the tony enclave of Cambridge, Mass. She was a business consultant; he was a real estate agent. They have two sons, 16 and 20, and are registered voters.

	Prosecutors said the couple communicated with Russian intelligence officials in 2004. They also accused Heathfield of chatting up someone who worked at a U.S. nuclear facility.

	They were well-liked at work and were praised for bringing influential, wealthy clients to their respective businesses. A federal judge ordered them to appear in court in Boston on July 16.

	"The purpose was to have this network of highly acculturated agents in reserve to be put in use during times of hostility," Joyal said.

	Some might be trained for sabotage. Others, like Peleaz and her college professor husband, Juan Lazaro, might have been trying to influence public thinking.

	Prosecutors said none of the suspects got any real secrets.

So this guy points out influence operations

	"Their legends were far too transparent and they were in too regular contact with their handlers. They almost seem like they wanted to be caught," Joyal said.

	He pointed to the flashy lifestyle of flame-haired vixen Anna Chapman, whose real name is Anya Kushchenko, as flying in the face of how spying is done.

	"She seems like she was living out some sort of James Bond fantasy," he said. "If this is the way they do business now, it's an embarrassment to the profession."

interesting--did Chapman want to be caught?


------


http://abcnews.go.com/blogs/politics/2011/11/how-the-fbi-busted-anna-chapman-and-the-russian-spy-ring/
	 “We were dealing with the most sophisticated cadre the Russians could put here,” Figliuzzi said.

	All of its members spoke fluent English, many had attended U.S. colleges or graduate schools, and some married each other, had children, and assumed American middle class lives, all the while searching out top level contacts U.S. policy making.

	“What we have learned here is the absolute resolve of a foreign intelligence service to penetrate U.S. foreign policy circles,” Figliuzzi said, adding that the Russians were in it for “the long haul — they were patient enough to wait decades to achieve their objective.”

	The Cold War, he added, did not mean the end to the “Spy vs. Spy” mentality between the United States and Russia.

	“The public needs to know this threat continues,” Figliuzzi said.  “Spying has been with us since the Old Testament; spying is with us now.”


------


https://www.theguardian.com/world/2010/jun/29/russian-spies-suburban-america
	Semenko, believed to be his real name, moved to Arlington last summer from New York where he worked for the Conference Board, a group that describes itself as offering "trusted insights for businesses worldwide".

	...Vicky Peláez has spent more than 20 years working as a columnist for one of the New York's best known Spanish-language newspapers, El Diario. Her speciality was strident criticism of US policy in Latin America, with a strong defence of Fidel Castro and Hugo Chávez.

	"Fidel Castro is already immortal!" Peláez wrote four years ago, when the Cuban leader was critically ill.

	Peláez, who was born in Peru, was arrested with her husband, Juan Lazaro, in Yonkers, a New York suburb. Lazaro claims to have been born in Uruguay. But the FBI says it bugged the couple's house and heard Lazaro describing how, as a child, he moved with his family to Siberia when the Germans attacked the Soviet Union in 1941.


------

http://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2011/oct/31/fbi-says-russian-spies-got-close-to-cabinet/
	Mr. Figliuzzi said the case was significant but that rounding up one network does not mean there is no longer a foreign intelligence threat.

	“To think that, just because we took down one network, that there are no more, or to think that we’ve seen everything there is to see would be foolhardy,” he said. “The bottom line is spying has been around with us since the Old Testament. It’s with us now and it will be with into the foreseeable future as long as the United States has what other nations want.”


------

http://nypost.com/2010/07/04/1000s-of-russian-spies-in-u-s-surpassing-cold-war-record/
	 “The Russians are very patient,” Korczak said. “My experience with the CIA was, ‘It has to be here, now, and make a big splash.’ The Russians will wait 15, 20 years — whatever.”

	This, he said, explains why the busted ring seems to have accomplished very little in the way of espionage.

	“The SVR’s goals are planned and scheduled,” Korczak said. “Those spies would have been able to achieve what they were sent here for — to obtain technology and military secrets, to exert influence on American policy and policymakers. They were well on their way.” 

	...Today’s SVR, however, is preoccupied with lesser goals. “These people are here to be agents of influence, to make connections,” Poteat said. “You want to influence American policy and opinion, including opinions about Russia.” 


Prof. Poteat:

http://www.iwp.edu/news_publications/detail/prof-poteat-comments-on-russian-spy-swap
	Yes, I'm tired hearing about it too. So, this is the last time you'll read about the quickest spy swap [read: giveaway] of all time. The reason: the media, after incandescing about Anna Chapman & Friends, has moved onto hotter, vacant stories, about celebs and sports figures. It went so fast, if you blinked, you might have missed it, or thought you'd imagined it.

	The spy story is off the front pages which means "mission accomplished" for that's where Obama and Russia wanted it -for different reasons. Both sides have stated this ‘trivial' incident must not be a return to the Cold War nor interfere with the bi-lateral relationship-whatever that is-confirming the swap was a political decision.

	The swap was another gamble the Administration took to tame the nuclear Russian bear but looks more like Roosevelt's failed attempt at Yalta.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/S._Eugene_Poteat

hmmm, idk about this guy


------


http://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/europe/the-timeline-russian-spies-2016360.html
	By Sam Muston 

	 Anna Chapman and Mikhail Semenko, 2010

	The arrest of the latest "deep-cover" Russian agents in the US will prove a further boon to writers of hackneyed spy fiction. Apparently eschewing the modern intelligence gathering techniques seen in the latest James Bond films, the pair would meet their handlers on park benches with the exchange of information preceded with: "Didn't we meet in California last summer?" "No, I think it was the Hamptons". The FBI have yet to confirm whether they wore trilby hats and carnations in their button holes.


------

https://web.archive.org/web/20100704035145/http://blogs.wsj.com:80/washwire/2010/06/29/alleged-russian-spies-a-novel-idea/
	Alleged Russian Spies: A Novel Idea?

	By Evan Perez

	The criminal complaints filed by U.S. prosecutors don’t portray any significant U.S. secrets that may have been compromised by the agents; in fact FBI wiretaps captured two of them discussing that they likely couldn’t pass vetting if they tried to get a U.S. government job. 


------

http://www.cbsnews.com/news/fbi-10-russian-spies-arrested-in-us/
	June 28, 2010

	There was no clue in the court papers unsealed Monday about how successful the agents had been, but they were alleged to have been long-term, deep cover spies. 

	...Richard and Cynthia Murphy, Juan Lazaro, Vicky Pelaez and Anna Chapman were held without bail. The defendants - most dressed in casual clothes like blue jeans, shorts and T-shirts - answered "Yes," when asked if they understood the charges. None entered a plea.

	"The evidence is truly, truly overwhelming," said Assistant U.S. Attorney Michael Farbiarz. Another hearing was set for Thursday.


-----

http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-1290475/Anna-Chapman-11-Russian-spies-accused-Cold-War-style-plot-US.html


	Red-headed femme fatale among 11 'Russian deep cover agents' accused of Cold War-style plot to spy on America

	By Daniel Bates


	The agent was pretending to send the alleged spy on a mission to deliver a fake passport to another female agent, according to court documents.

	'Are you ready for this step?' he asked.

	'S*** yes,' was her emphatic reply.

Isn't she cool???!


	Anna Chapman was of particular interest - and not just for her reputation as a beauty.

	She is believed to have entered the Russian Mission to the United Nations on ten occasions and sent messages to agents via a private wi-fi network.

not what I heard...

	The femme fatale, the stay-at-home dad, the top newspaper columnist: Who are the bumbling Russian 'spies'?

------

http://www.foxnews.com/us/2010/07/02/children-accused-russian-spies-confront-identity-crisis-uncertain-futures.html
	At least two of the children, the toddler and pre-schooler whose parents posed as American Michael Zottoli and Canadian Patricia Mills, will be going to Russia. Federal prosecutors said Friday the couple acknowledged they are Russian citizens and instructed a family friend now caring for the children to contact relatives in Russia to arrange for the youngsters to go there.

	By most accounts, the couples charged in the case appeared to be caring parents. Several raised children who excelled.

	Tim Foley wrote in his blog about speaking English, French and German and said he was learning Chinese. He said he was majoring in International Affairs with a concentration in Asian studies, and wrote about his plan to spend a semester in Beijing.

	His 16-year-old brother, Alex, attended the International School of Boston, a private high school where some classes are taught in French and the theme is "shaping global citizens."


------

http://www.nbcnews.com/id/37997994/ns/us_news-security/t/russians-next-door-sexy-spy-great-tenants/
	It’s a tabloid editor’s dream come true: Ten people are accused of being undercover Russian spies, and one of them is even photogenic enough to deserve her own slideshow (see The New York Post’s tribute to what they are calling "Sexy Russian Spy Anna Chapman" here).

	But for the neighbors of the 10 people arrested throughout the Northeast, it's more of a nightmare. Who are these people who they had come to trust as a professor, a newspaper columnist, and an architect, among other well-respected professions?

profile of the spies


------

https://www.theatlantic.com/international/archive/2010/06/the-secret-lives-of-deep-cover-russian-spies/345026/


	The Secret Lives of Deep-Cover Russian Spies

	Who are "the Illegals"?

    	Max Fisher

	First they captured our intel, now they capture our imaginations. The 11 Russian spies who lived under deep cover in the U.S. for years may not have actually secured any classified information, but their bizarre stories and Cold War-style mystique have won them eager profiles in nearly every media outlet. What is it like to be one of the so-called "Illegals"?


	...The 'Femme Fatale' Spy The New York Post's Bruce Golding gets a little carried away. "A ring of 11 Russian moles right out of a Cold War spy novel was smashed yesterday -- and among those busted was a flame-haired, 007-worthy beauty who flitted from high-profile parties to top-secret meetings around Manhattan. ... Russian national Anna Chapman -- a 28-year-old divorcee with a masters in economics, an online real-estate business, a fancy Financial District apartment and a Victoria's Secret body -- had been passing information to a Russian government official every Wednesday since January, authorities charged."


------

http://nypost.com/2010/06/29/spy-rings-femme-fatale/
	Spy ring’s ‘femme fatale’

	By Bruce Golding

	A ring of 11 Russian moles right out of a Cold War spy novel was smashed yesterday — and among those busted was a flame-haired, 007-worthy beauty who flitted from high-profile parties to top-secret meetings around Manhattan. 

	...The FBI claimed the two were corresponding via a secret online network.

	Last week, an undercover agent pretending to be a Russian official arranged a meeting to talk about the weekly laptop exchanges, pretending to be ready to send the sexy spy on a mission to deliver a fake passport to another female agent, according to the federal complaint.

	“Are you ready for this step?” he asked. “S¤-¤-¤-, yes,” Chapman allegedly gushed. 


------

http://www.seattletimes.com/seattle-news/accused-russian-spies-sure-fooled-people-in-the-seattle-area/
	Accused Russian spies sure fooled people in the Seattle area 

	If Michael Zottoli and Patricia Mills secretly were Russian spies, they did an Oscar-worthy job of maintaining their cover as a boring young Seattle couple slavishly devoted to their toddler son.

	By Christine Willmsen and Jonathan Martin

sounds upset?


------

https://newrepublic.com/article/76216/why-dont-we-take-the-russian-spies-seriously

	Why Don't We Take the Russian Spies Seriously?
	By Adam Kirsch

	How can we explain this levity about what is, after all, a hostile action by an authoritarian, nuclear-armed state? For one thing, there is the failure of the “illegals” to actually get any American secrets—indeed, they are not even being charged with espionage, only with failure to register as agents of a foreign government. It is not just the harmlessness of the spies that the media has focused on, however, but the obsolescence of their techniques. The use of invisible ink and money caches and garish code phrases all seem to come, in the words that have become mandatory in reporting this story, like something out of a Cold War thriller.


pointing out media not taking spies seriously, trying to explain it

	When you think about it, this is a silly observation: Real spies seem to act like fictional spies only because fictional spies are modeled on real spies. What the mockery of spycraft is really meant to communicate, I suspect, is not that this or that particular spying tactic is obsolete, but that the idea of Russia as an enemy is obsolete. In popular culture, when the obsolete makes an unexpected re-appearance, it takes the form of kitsch or camp, and we all know the proper attitude of superior disdain to adopt toward it. 

says people see the idea of "Russia as an enemy" obselete (do they now?)

	The other reason why we can’t take Russian espionage too seriously is that it has been shorn of exactly the element that made Soviet espionage so serious: ideology. Americans who became Soviet spies were not just betraying their country, they were endorsing an ideological critique of their country. In the most dramatic sense, they were “voting with their feet” for Communism; and as long as Communism had the power to win such dedicated converts, it could not be dismissed as a philosophical rival to liberal democracy. When Alger Hiss was exposed as a Soviet spy, it forced a whole generation of left-liberals to examine their own consciences, since they had professed sympathy with the same principles that led Hiss to become a traitor. “Certainly, a generation was on trial with Hiss,” Leslie Fiedler wrote in his essay “Hiss, Chambers, and the Age of Innocence”: “the half-deliberate blindness of so many decent people … is a vital part of the total Hiss case.”

	When Russia spies on America in 2010, however, none of us are implicated. We are not even especially outraged. Isn’t it an acknowledged rule of international relations that countries try to gain an advantage over one another? Don’t we all want America to do the same kind of thing to Russia that Russia has been doing to us—though, we hope, more smartly and effectively? There is no moral issue raised here, only the old game of power politics, from which there seems to be no escape.

saying the idea of Russia spying on U.S. isn't shocking

	But the fact that, from 1941 to 1989, the wars America fought were preeminently ideological—first against Nazism, then against Communism—should not make us forget that mere power politics is just as capable of bringing on catastrophe. Germany and France in 1914 were much more similar societies than America and Russia are today, yet it took very little ideological enmity to make them bring down the palace of European civilization upon their own heads. If the day ever comes that we have to decide whether to honor our treaty obligation to defend Poland against Russian aggression—and recent Russian history makes that possibility all too easy to imagine—then we may look back incredulously at this moment, when Russian spies and Russian ambitions could make us smile.

interesting

------

http://www.cbc.ca/news/world/why-is-russia-still-planting-sleeper-agents-abroad-1.917768

	Why is Russia still planting 'sleeper' agents abroad?

	By Jennifer Clibbon

	The drama of the U.S.-Russia spy swap is over, but in the process 16 lives have been changed forever.

	Ten Russian "sleepers" leave behind a comfortable suburban existence in the U.S. and have been returned to a life and family in a Russia for which they may now feel little connection.

	An 11th member of the ring, who went by the name Christopher Metsos, is still on the loose and American authorities are in the process of deporting a 12th Russian national who was scooped up later.

	For the four Russians, including two former high-ranking intelligence officers, who were released from prison to complete the swap, freedom must be especially sweet.

	Nevertheless, their futures are uncertain as they navigate new lives in the West.

	...Unlike Philby and they others, they have gone back to live in their native country, where they still have jobs and family and friends. 

	To be sure, they are unlikely to receive promotions, given that they allowed themselves to be discovered by the FBI.  But they won't be sent to labour camps like they would have been in Stalin's day.

get the sense they are worried about defectors?

using carrots more than sticks this time?


------


http://www.politico.com/states/new-york/albany/story/2012/01/the-big-russian-life-of-anna-chapman-ex-spy-067223
	The big Russian life of Anna Chapman, ex-spy

	By Brett Forrest 

	It has been nearly a year and a half since the Federal Bureau of Investigation seized Anna Chapman, the Russian spy who had been working undercover in Manhattan real estate. Her arrest along with nine other Russians broke up the largest foreign intelligence network discovered on American soil since the Cold War.

	The Illegals, as they were called inside the Department of Justice, had infiltrated American society, nearly all of them going by Anglicized names, passing themselves off as white-collar professionals.

	But, long afterward, it's difficult to see what the spies ever learned or did of any real importance while stationed stateside on Vladimir Putin’s orders. Equally difficult to uncover is just how these agents could have fooled anyone, pretending to be American-born while speaking such heavily accented English.


------

http://www.thedailybeast.com/russian-spies-the-illegals-laughter-at-the-kremlin
	Russian Spies, The Illegals: Laughter at the Kremlin

	The unlikely saga of the spies known as The Illegals has caused much mirth, but no diplomatic crisis, with Russia. Julia Ioffe talks to Russian officials who can't stop laughing.

	Boris Reznik, a parliamentarian from Russia’s ruling party, has a take on the spy saga now unfolding in the U.S.: “Why are you causing this scandal?” he says, chuckling. “Watch out, or we’ll arrest all your spies here in Moscow! You guys have more of them here.”

	Aside from the unfortunate timing of the event—coming just on the heels of Dmitry Medvedev’s honeymoon in the U.S. and at the G-8 summit—the roundup of the supposed Russian spy ring, known as The Illegals, has become some kind of strange American joke in Moscow. “It’s kind of unclear, and kind of stupid, and looks a bit like what we had here with that rock,” says Putin’s former chief of staff, the longtime Kremlin player Alexander Voloshin. He, too, laughs at the mention of the alleged spies. The rock he refers to is the 2006 incident when the Russian security services accused the British of using a rock to spy on them in Moscow. “It has about the same flavor,” Voloshin says, still trying to shake the giggles.

	Click the Image to View Our Gallery of Spies We Loved

	Sure, Russian officials have expressed hurt at the timing: Couldn’t they have waited a few months, you know, for the afterglow to pass after the high-level burger summit? And, behaving not unlike a woman scorned, Russians wonder: Who is trying to break America and us up?

	...Russians note that this motley crew hasn’t even been charged with spying. Instead, they stand accused of failing to register as foreign agents (maximum sentence five years) and money laundering (which could carry 20). And reading this complaint, it seems much more likely that a rogue element in the Russian secret service needed to launder some stolen cash and stumbled on some starry-eyed American suburban yokels and asked: “Hey, wanna be a spy?”


------


https://www.buzzfeed.com/russianspies/4-awesome-real-life-spy-stories
	Double Agents And Sexy Spies: 4 Real Life Espionage Stories

	Community User

	Spies are in the news right now, which is a good thing, because spies are pretty much the fucking best. Here are some of the most cold-bloodedly badass IRL spies of the last century, up to and including the awesome retro Russian spies who just got caught this week. 


https://www.buzzfeed.com/scott/the-illegals-program?utm_term=.ebBbGAQj4#.ubzObwZBg
	The Illegals Program

	Scott Lamb

 	The U.S. has uncovered an amazing Russian spy program, which has been operating undercover for years.

	10 people were arrested Monday in a sweep associated with the discovery. Many of the spies lived in pairs, and had babies as part of their cover! (Haha, spy babies.) This will no doubt get juicy, and then be turned into a movie starring Angelina Jolie.

------

http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2010/07/11/AR2010071102416.html
	Sources: Call by Russian spy Anna Chapman to dad in Moscow led U.S. to hasten arrests

	By Walter Pincus


------

http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2010/06/30/AR2010063005074.html
	Alleged Russian agent Anna Chapman could have warmed up any Cold War night

	By Monica Hesse

 	There were 11 alleged Russian agents arrested this week, under accusations that they'd been living as Americans while reporting back to the mother country.

	But mostly we care about the hot one. 

	Ever since photos of Anna Chapman began circulating online late Tuesday, the Internet at large has been foaming, frothing, fanatic for details about the reported 28-year-old secret agent/Maxim model look-alike who specialized in sultry-eyed, pouty-lipped, come-hither stares. Da, da, da!

------

http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2012/04/03/anna-chapman-obama_n_1398430.html

no author

------

http://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/politics/man-whose-wmd-lies-led-to-100000-deaths-confesses-all-7606236.html?utm_source=huffpost&utm_medium=huffpost&utm_campaign=huffpost
	Man whose WMD lies led to 100,000 deaths confesses all

	Jonathan Owen

	The fear that Chapman would compromise a senior US official in a "honey trap" was a key reason for the arrest and deportation of the Russian spy ring of 10 people, of which she was a part, in 2010. "We were becoming very concerned," he says. "They were getting close enough to a sitting US cabinet member that we thought we could no longer allow this to continue." Mr Figliuzzi refuses to name the individual who was being targeted.

wasn't talking about Chapman


------

http://www.nytimes.com/2010/12/31/world/europe/31chapman.html
	Russian Spy? Maybe So. TV Darling, Absolutely.

	By MICHAEL SCHWIRTZ

	MOSCOW — She likes spy movies and the actress Angelina Jolie. She might be considering an acting career herself and really wants a feline pet. Well, a lion cub.

	These were the revelations from the first major public appearance by Anna Chapman, the young redhead who has achieved Hollywood-like celebrity here since she and nine others accused of being Russian sleeper agents were outed and deported from the United States six months ago.

------

http://www.businessinsider.com/putin-anna-chapman-affair-wife-2012-4
	RUMOR: Putin's Alleged Affair With Ex-Spy Anna Chapman Is Why We Never See His Wife

	Sanya Khetani


------

https://www.forbes.com/sites/work-in-progress/2010/06/29/anna-chapman-russia-spy-or-real-estate-whiz/#50e651a363fb
	Anna Chapman: Sexy Russian Spy or Real Estate Whiz

	Meghan Casserly

	The Cold War may be over but Bond girls never go out of style.

	This morning’s papers have made much of suspected spy Anna Chapman’s youth and beauty in their coverage of an alleged espionage Russian ring. The New York Post described the redhead as “a 28 year old divorcee with a masters in economics, an online real-estate business, a fancy Financial District apartment and a Victoria’s Secret body.”


------

http://www.csmonitor.com/World/Europe/2010/1008/Anna-Chapman-glamorous-Russian-spy-bids-farewell-to-astronauts

	 Anna Chapman, glamorous Russian spy, bids farewell to astronauts

	Anna Chapman, the Russian spy deported from the US, is living the life of a celebrity at home, defying espionage convention and casting doubt over whether she was ever a real spy.

	By Fred Weir


	Though the Kremlin clearly acknowledged that Chapman and the others were indeed Russian agents by exchanging them for four convicted spies being held in Russian prisons, many security experts continue to insist there was something fishy, perhaps involving political machinations or corruption, about the spy scandal that blew up last June.

	"Anna Chapman had nothing to do with the intelligence services; she's a pop figure, used to attract media attention to this or that event," says Stanislav Belkovsky, head of the Kremlin-connected Institute of National Strategy.

	"All those so-called spies were just buffoons, and never carried out any real functions. It just gave our special services a pretext to ask for more money, and therefore I would term it as corruption," rather than espionage, he says.

------

http://nymag.com/daily/intelligencer/2012/01/anna-chapman-is-still-living-the-high-life.html
	Anna Chapman Is Still Living the High Life

	By Joe Coscarelli

	Super sexual Russian spy Anna Chapman continues to be super and sexual in the motherland, where she stars in a television show, drives a black Porsche, and hangs out with Vladimir Putin — underwater. Capital New York has a huge feature on the international gossip darling and she’s as alluring as ever, maintaining her magical spell over ex-boyfriends and flirting relentlessly with the article’s author, Brett Forrest. But she’ll never forget those who got her where she is today: New York City tabloids.

ha!

------

http://www.cbsnews.com/news/anna-chapman-how-did-the-fbi-nab-alleged-russian-spy/
 	By Edecio Martinez

	Anna Chapman: How Did the FBI Nab Alleged Russian Spy?

	NEW YORK (CBS/AP) How did the FBI catch Anna Chapman, the woman dubbed the "femme fatale" of the alleged Russian spy ring accused of trying to infiltrate "policymaking circles" in the U.S.?

	PICTURES: Anna Chapman

	A criminal complaint details how Chapman allegedly used fake identities, coded radio transmissions and encrypted data to avoid detection.

	...Authorities say the undercover's parting words to her had been, "Your colleagues in Moscow, they know you're doing a good job. So keep it up."


------

https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2011-09-29/how-anna-chapman-became-the-face-of-kremlin-capitalism
	She may have done unremarkable work back in the U.S. as a spy for Russia, but the woman the Russian media calls Agent 90-60-90 (for her measurements, in centimeters) is, somehow, everywhere. It’s been a little over a year since her return, a year of centerfolds, talk shows, and political rallies. The media, largely controlled by the authorities, still reports each of her many moves. Clearly the Kremlin has found her a useful hero.

	Days after she was unmasked by the FBI along with nine other spies living as unassuming professionals in Boston, New York, and New Jersey and traded for four Russian prisoners on a tarmac in Vienna, Chapman received a hero’s welcome at the Kremlin. She and her fellow spies sang a patriotic song from the Soviet film Sword and Shield with Putin and, a few months later, were given medals by Medvedev. She was appointed to a high post in the ruling party’s youth brigades and was the subject of a fawning one-hour interview special on government-controlled Channel One. She attended an innovation forum led by Medvedev and showed up at the Baikonur Cosmodrome in Kazakhstan to cheer on a Russian rocket launch.

	...Even that speech, however, was interrupted by hecklers——afterward, one student called her “a Kremlin project.” It’s true that Kremlinism is in her blood. Her biography reflects her former profession; it has all the unexplained plot points of a redacted document. What’s known is that she grew up in Volgograd. Her father worked in embassies around the world, reportedly for the state security services. (Deputy Prime Minister Sergei Ivanov, a Putin ally and former spook, told Kommersant newspaper that he has known Chapman “from childhood” because he had worked with her father.) She went on to study economics at the well-regarded Peoples’ Friendship University in Moscow, built originally to cater to the elite of Soviet-aligned countries (other former students: Mahmoud Abbas and Carlos the Jackal, who did not graduate). On a trip to London, she met her future husband Alex; they wed in 2003 and moved to England full-time. (They have since divorced.) Once there, she seems to have at least cruised the world of finance, working for a time at Barclays and, in her own words, “studying investment banking a lot” while in Britain before branching out on her own in New York. But her time in New York is far more defined by her misadventures as a spy than by her success in business.


------

http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-1290708/Russian-spy-Anna-Chapman-access-Barclays-account-details-London.html

	'Femme fatale' Anna had access to Barclays account details in London

	By Daniel Bates and Vanessa Allen for the Daily Mail

------

http://jezebel.com/5588979/russian-spy-anna-chapmans-bizarre-facebook-world
	Russian Spy Anna Chapman Rules Bizarre Facebook Posse

	Anna North

	We're not sure what's weirder — that sexy Russian spy Anna Chapman is putting inspiring quotes on her Facebook page while being debriefed by the Russian government, or that so many people are watching.

	Chapman has taken down the sexy pictures that got so much play after her arrest. But her Facebook page is up — and her wall has become quite popular. Chapman's becoming a regular Sarah Palin of spying, amassing a large and loyal band of e-followers. After a little Facebook-stalking of our own, here's what we've learned about Chapman Nation:

	...Folks writing on Chapman's wall provide support and praise, mostly about her hotness ("Such a Beautiful Face...I love the closeup!") Plenty are willing to slam her enemies, like the UK: "Who wants a passport from the crooked teeth, tea sipping monkey island aka "Great" Britain anyway?" But some offer more than mere words. Says one, " I would like to option the rights for a reality show for you!" (he must have read our post). Another may have a job opportunity: "from switzerland with love... by the way: switzerland still has lots of secrets to be revealed - could be a job for you? ;-)" It's a good idea — as we've learned, if you commit any crimes in other countries, Switzerland's the place to go.

	...Perhaps it's not for us to judge, but some Chapman fans do strike us as a little strange. Some have questionable political beliefs, like the guy whose dislikes include Hitler, Stalin, George W. Bush, and Israel (he loves The Little Prince though!). Some have odd predilections: one fan, who left Chapman the touching message, "i miss a beautiful women," lists his interests as "Mountain Climbing, eviserations" [sic]. And some are all too willing to marry a spy they've never met. Witness this exchange:


------


https://www.theguardian.com/world/2010/jul/09/russian-spies-espionage-exchange
	Russian spies going back to the cold – 10 agents admit their guilt 

 	Tom Parfitt in Moscow and Chris McGreal in Washington

	While the US-Russian swap may avoid any potential embarrassment to either government that a trial might pose, the exposure of Russia's spies on US soil leaves behind considerable disagreement over how seriously to take their espionage ring. While the FBI has portrayed the deep-cover "sleeper" agents as a threat to American security, their at times bumbling attempts to infiltrate high policy-making circles has made them figures of fun to many Americans.

	Chapman, a red-headed 28-year-old whose British former husband has sold compromising photos to tabloids, has become such a celebrity that a New York newspaper lamented her departure and asked if the city could keep her.


------

http://www.nydailynews.com/news/world/anna-chapman-russian-sleeper-agents-arrested-awarded-kremlin-top-medal-article-1.190482
	Bumbling Russian sleeper agents get Kremlin's top honor
	BY Helen Kennedy 

	Ten Russian sleeper spies who were so busy leading fake suburban American lives that they failed to learn any actual secrets were awarded the Kremlin's top medal Monday.


------

http://theweek.com/articles/493058/7-best-cloakanddagger-moments-from-russian-spy-case
	7 best cloak-and-dagger moments from the Russian spy case

	The Week Staff

	At times the U.S. government's case against the 11 alleged "deep cover" Russian spies reads like a Cold War thriller; other times, it seems like a spoof, filled with bumbling Austin Powers-like amateurs. The SVR (successor to the KGB) employed techniques both worthy of a James Bond villain (stealth laptop networks) and almost too primitive to believe (invisible ink). Here are seven of the most remarkable spy-vs.-spy tactics — of both varieties — uncovered during the FBI investigation:


------

http://www.christiancrusade.com/why_is_russia_still_spying_on_us2.PDF


talks about how the fact that Peleaz was a journalist wasn't talked about that much in media

making it sound crazy?

------

http://www.vanityfair.com/news/2010/07/spy-spotting-guide-201007
	Spies Like Everyone

	Surely the Russians aren’t the only ones conducting espionage while disguised as boring old suburbanites. Power your paranoid fantasies with Bruce Feirstein’s top-secret field guide to spotting the moles among us.

	by Bruce Feirstein

------

http://content.time.com/time/world/article/0,8599,2000842,00.html
	"Those kinds of things haven't happened for several years." Burton claims that the U.S. Attorney's Office doesn't touch cases unless there's "at least 90% certainty" of a conviction. 


	....The Russian government should be praised for claiming the suspects in this latest spy scandal, says Alexander Golts, a respected independent defense and security analyst. "In one way or another, they were acting on behalf of Russia, and Russia took responsibility for them," he says. "Up until [the admission], it was pretty cynical of Russian officials to reject them." Given the negligible intelligence the alleged network appeared to have gathered, the suspects might have been better off openly declaring their presence to U.S. authorities. "Any talk of real espionage in this case is ridiculous," Golts says. "If they had just registered as lobbyists, they would have been just fine."


What if they arrested and convicted Alan Dershowitz? or any spy trying to foment racial conflict?

They really should, it does the public a disservice not to. Better not to negotiate with that.

------

http://newsfeed.time.com/2012/04/04/russian-spy-anna-chapman-is-back-in-the-spotlight-mistakenly/
	Russian Spy Anna Chapman Is Back in the Spotlight – Mistakenly

	By Lauren Daniels

	The FBI quickly issued a statement striking down the Telegraph’s conclusion. “There is no allegation or suggestion in the complaint that Anna Chapman or anyone else associated with this investigation attempted to seduce a U.S. Cabinet official,” FBI spokesperson Paul Bresson told ABC News.


------

http://gawker.com/5929300/russian-spies-wanted-to-turn-americas-kids-into-spy-kids
	Russian Spies Wanted to Turn America’s Kids Into Spy Kids
	Caity Weaver

	Of course, these same officials are also possibly fucking with the Journal (if they're intelligence officials at all — maybe they're also Russian spies?) when they describe a melodramatic scene allegedly captured by surveillance equipment, in which Foley discusses with mom and pop his decision to enter the family business:

		"At the end of the discussion with his parents…the young man stood up and saluted ‘Mother Russia.' He also agreed to travel to Russia to begin formal espionage training."

	How's that dork ever going to become a spy? You gotta know how to play it real cool and smooth if you want to be a part of this crazy spy world, baby.

	For the record, a lawyer for Tim Foley, the most bad-ass kid who ever lived on anyone's hall sophomore year, calls these crap-sounding accusations "crap" and says it would have been too risky for his parents to reveal their secret lives to their putz of a son.


------

http://www.newsweek.com/russian-spy-anna-chapman-not-ready-sell-story-yet-217402
	Anna Chapman, the flame-haired femme fatale who became the poster girl for the recent U.S.-Russia spy swap, intends—for now, at least—to abide by a plea-bargain provision supposedly barring her from selling her story. But she has considered selling (or at least telling) it, her lawyer, Robert Baum, has acknowledged in a conversation and e-mails with Declassified. According to people familiar with the wildly competitive checkbook journalism of London’s Fleet Street tabloids, Chapman could net a substantial fortune from the tale of how she allegedly became a Russian undercover operative assigned to infiltrate American society. And Baum admits that his client had reason to worry about money when she accepted the plea agreement, given that her online real-estate firm had been effectively derailed by her arrest. “She felt that the only source of income that she might have was based on her story,” says Baum. There’s just one problem: a clause in the plea deal says Chapman and the other deported sleeper agents will turn over to the U.S. government any proceeds they might get from selling their stories, whether such profits come to them directly or to an associate or family member. 



http://www.newsweek.com/russian-spy-anna-chapman-not-ready-sell-story-yet-217402
	Russian Spy Anna Chapman Not Ready to Sell Story—Yet
	By Mark Hosenball 


http://www.newsweek.com/shock-and-horror-spies-engage-bribery-217184
	Shock and Horror: Spies Engage in Bribery
	By Mark Hosenball 

	Some U.S. national-security and intelligence officials are expressing exasperation at revelations—including front-page stories two days' running in the nation’s most important newspapers—alleging that the CIA has been secretly bribing numerous aides to Hamid Karzai, the embattled Afghan president.


------

http://www.nytimes.com/2010/06/30/nyregion/30suspects.html
	Curiosities Emerge About Suspected Russian Agents

	By JAMES BARRONJUNE 29, 2010 

	Neighbors said the F.B.I. descended on the house — 15 to 20 agents in black vans. The Murphys, led out in handcuffs, were put in separate cars. Neighbors said their younger daughter was home; their older daughter, who enter middle school in the fall, was at a friend’s birthday party. She was driven home by a friend while the raid was going on. She and her sister later left the house, carrying sleeping bags.
